Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.170

Prequalification of minority and women-owned businesses—Waiver of performance bond.

(1) State agencies shall not require a performance bond for any public works project that does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars awarded to a prequalified and certified minority or woman-owned business that has been prequalified as provided under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) A limited prequalification questionnaire shall be required assuring:

(a) That the bidder has adequate financial resources or the ability to secure such resources;

(b) That the bidder can meet the performance schedule;

(c) That the bidder is experienced in the type of work to be performed; and

(d) That all equipment to be used is adequate and functioning and that all equipment operators are qualified to operate such equipment.

[ 1993 c 512 s 10.]